Hawaii statutes.
§577-9 Jury trial, when. In trials of
any person over the age of majority arising under sections 709-902, 709-903,
709-904, and 709-905, the person proceeded against shall have the right to a
trial by jury which shall be granted as in other cases, unless waived. If the
finding of the jury is against the person tried their verdict shall so state,
in which event the court, in its discretion, may enter such judgment as it
deems proper in the premises. [L 1925, c 167, pt of §1; RL 1935, §4516; RL
1945, §12266; RL 1955, §330-7; HRS §577-9; am L 1973, c 211, §2(a); am L 1975,
c 77, §1(3)]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next